dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="b/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edda</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="l/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bo__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="het/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>     <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ölja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ölja</l>         <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öljer</l>        <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öljes</l>        <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>öljs</l>         <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olde</l>        <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olt</l>         <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ölj</l>          <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öljande</l>      <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>         <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olt</l>         <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olda</l>        <r>ölja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/älja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>älja</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljer</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljes</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äljs</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ålde</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ålt</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älj</l>          <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljande</l>      <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åld</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ålt</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ålda</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="v/älja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>älja</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljer</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljes</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äljs</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alt</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älj</l>          <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äljande</l>      <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ald</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alt</l>         <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alda</l>        <r>älja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/åss__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>         <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>        <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogs</l>        <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agits</l>      <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åss</l>         <r>åss<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="stö/dja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>dja</l>         <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>        <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>djer</l>        <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>djes</l>        <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ds</l>         <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>        <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>         <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>          <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>djande</l>      <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>         <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>         <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dda</l>        <r>dja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="be" a="is">       <i>b</i><par n="b/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="le" a="is">       <i>l</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bero på" a="is">  <i>bero</i><par n="bo__vblex"/><p><l><b/>på</l><r><g><b/>på</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bo">              <i>bo</i><par n="bo__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dölja" a="is">    <i>d</i><par n="d/ölja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="heta" a="is">     <i>het</i><par n="het/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bry" a="is">      <i>bry</i><par n="bo__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slåss" a="is">    <i>sl</i><par n="sl/åss__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sälja" a="is">    <i>s</i><par n="s/älja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stödja" a="is">   <i>stö</i><par n="stö/dja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="understödja" a="is"><i>understö</i><par n="stö/dja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="välja" a="is">    <i>v</i><par n="v/älja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svälja" a="is">   <i>sv</i><par n="v/älja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klä av sig" a="is"><i>klä</i><par n="bo__vblex"/><p><l><b/>av<b/>sig</l><r><g><b/>av<b/>sig</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="klä" a="is">      <i>klä</i><par n="bo__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strö" a="is">     <i>strö</i><par n="bo__vblex"/></e>
